Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-759
Standard college admission test; administered; expense.

No later than the 2017-18 school year, the State Department of Education shall administer a standard college admission test, selected by the State Board of Education, to students in the eleventh grade attending a public school in the state in lieu of the assessment for the one grade in high school as required under section 79-760.03. The department shall pay the expenses of administering such college admission test.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 26;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 151;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB930, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 28.